South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3605.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 20-3-130(C)(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) the employment history and earning potential of each spouse. For purposes of this item, the earning potential for a salaried spouse is the salary of the spouse, and the earning potential for a self-employed spouse is twice the minimum wage; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----